sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf > Tillbehör till golfbagar: Golfbagvagnar; Överdrag och fodral till golfbagar; Bärremmar för golfbagar; Klubb-borstar för golf; Kylväskor för golf; Mobil- och GPS-hållare för golf; Hållare för scorekort; Golfparaplyer; Värdesaks- och tillbehörsväskor för golf
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn > Phụ kiện giỏ gôn: Xe đẩy túi gôn; Vỏ bọc và vali đựng túi gôn; Dây đeo túi gôn; Chổi vệ sinh gậy gôn; Túi giữ nhiệt gôn; Giá đỡ điện thoại & GPS gôn; Ví đựng thẻ điểm gôn; Ô chơi gôn; Túi đựng phụ kiện & đồ giá trị chơi gôn
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf > Golfbägin lisätarvikkeet: Golfkärryt; Golfbägien peitteet ja kotelot; Golfbägien hihnat; Mailaharjat; Golf-kylmälaukut; Golf-puhelin- ja GPS-pidikkeet; Tuloskorttikotelot; Golfsateenvarjot; Golfbägin arvoesine- ja tarvikepussit
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф > Аксессуары для сумок для гольфа: Тележки для сумок для гольфа; Чехлы для сумок для гольфа; Ремни для сумок для гольфа; Щетки для клюшек для гольфа; Сумки-холодильники для гольфа; Держатели для телефонов и GPS для гольфа; Держатели для счетных карточек для гольфа; Зонты для гольфа; Сумки для ценных вещей и аксессуаров для гольфа
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf > Golftasketilbehør: Golftaskevogne; Golftaskecovere; Bæreseler til golftasker; Børster til golfkøller; Køletasker til golf; Telefon- og GPS-holdere til golf; Scorekortholdere til golf; Golfparaplyer; Pungetuier og tilbehørsposer til golf
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas > Golfo krepšių priedai: Golfo krepšių vežimėliai; Golfo krepšių apvalkalai ir dėklai; Golfo krepšio dirželiai; Golfo lazdų šepečiai; Golfo vėsinimo krepšiai; Golfo telefonų ir GPS laikikliai; Golfo rezultatų kortelių laikikliai; Golfo skėčiai; Golfo vertingų daiktų ir aksesuarų dėklai
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf > Golftáska-kiegészítők: Golftáskakocsik; Golftáskahuzatok és -tokok; Golfzsák-pántok; Golfütő-tisztító kefék; Golf hűtőtáskák; Golf telefon- és GPS-tartók; Golfpontkártya-tartók; Golfesernyők; Golf értéktartó- és kiegészítőtasakok
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ > ゴルフバッグ関連用品: ゴルフバッグカート; ゴルフバッグカバー・ケース; ゴルフバッグ用ストラップ; ゴルフクラブ用ブラシ; ゴルフ用クーラーバッグ; ゴルフ用スマホ・GPSホルダー; ゴルフスコアカードホルダー; ゴルフ用傘; ゴルフ用貴重品・アクセサリーポーチ
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf > Tilbehør for golfbager: Golfvogner; Golfbagtrekk og -vesker; Stropper for golfbag; Børster for golfkøller; Kjølebager for golf; Mobil- og GPS-holdere for golf; Holdere til scorekort for golf; Golfparaplyer; Verdisak- og tilbehørsposer for golf
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf > Accesorios para bolsas de golf: Carritos para bolsas de golf; Fundas para bolsas de golf; Correas para bolsas de golf; Cepillos para palos de golf; Bolsas térmicas para golf; Soportes de teléfono y GPS para golf; Soportes para tarjetas de puntuación de golf; Paraguas de golf; Estuches para objetos de valor y accesorios de golf
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf > Golfové pytle – příslušenství: Vozíky na golfové pytle; Obaly a pouzdra na golfové pytle; Popruhy na golfové bagy; Kartáčky na golfové hole; Chladicí tašky na golf; Držáky telefonu a GPS na golf; Desky na golfové skórekarty; Golfové deštníky; Pouzdra na cennosti a příslušenství pro golf
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf > Golf Bag Accessories: Golf Bag Carts; Golf Bag Covers & Cases; Golf Bag Straps; Golf Club Brushes; Golf Cooler Bags; Golf Phone & GPS Holders; Golf Scorecard Holders; Golf Umbrellas; Golf Valuables & Accessory Pouches
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프 > 골프 가방 부대용품: 골프백 카트; 골프백 커버/케이스; 골프백 스트랩; 골프 클럽 브러시; 골프 쿨러 백; 골프 폰 및 GPS 거치대; 골프 스코어카드 홀더; 골프 우산; 골프 귀중품 및 액세서리 파우치
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf > Golftaschenzubehör: Golftaschentrolleys; Golftaschenhüllen; Golfbag-Gurte; Golfschlägerbürsten; Golf-Kühltaschen; Golf-Handy- & GPS-Halterungen; Golf-Scorekartenhalter; Golf-Regenschirme; Wertsachen- & Zubehörtaschen für Golf
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf > Accessoires pour sacs de golf: Chariots pour sacs de golf; Housses et protections pour sacs de golf; Sangles pour sac de golf; Brosses pour club de golf; Sacs isothermes de golf; Supports de téléphone et GPS de golf; Porte-cartes de score de golf; Parapluies de golf; Pochettes pour accessoires et objets de valeur de golf
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf > Príslušenstvo golfových tašiek: Vozíky na golfové tašky; Obaly a puzdrá na golfové tašky; Popruhy na golfové tašky; Kefy na golfové palice; Chladiace tašky na golf; Držiaky na golfové telefóny a GPS; Držiaky skórovacích kariet na golf; Golfové dáždniky; Golfové puzdrá na cennosti a príslušenstvo
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf > Accesorii pentru geanta de golf: Cărucioare pentru genți de golf; Huse și cutii pentru genți de golf; Curele pentru geanta de golf; Perii pentru crose de golf; Genți frigorifice pentru golf; Suporturi pentru telefon și GPS la golf; Suporturi pentru scorul de golf; Umbrele de golf; Buzunare și genți pentru valori și accesorii de golf
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf > Dodatki za torbe za golf: Vozički za torbe za golf; Prevleke in etuiji za torbe za golf; Trakovi za golf torbe; Krtače za golf palice; Hladilne torbe za golf; Držala za telefon in GPS-naprave za golf; Držala za golf kartice z rezultati; Dežniki za golf; Golf torbe za dragocenosti in dodatke
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf > Accessori sacche da golf: Carrelli per sacche da golf; Coperture e astucci sacche golf; Cinghie per sacche da golf; Spazzole per mazze da golf; Borse termiche da golf; Supporti per telefono e GPS da golf; Porta scorecard da golf; Ombrelli da golf; Sacchette per accessori e oggetti di valore da golf
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf > Akcesoria do toreb golfowych: Wózki na torby golfowe; Pokrowce na torby golfowe; Paski do toreb golfowych; Szczotki do kijów golfowych; Torby termiczne do golfa; Uchwyty na telefon i GPS do golfa; Etui na karty wyników golfowych; Parasole golfowe; Saszetki na akcesoria i cenne przedmioty dla golfistów
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf > Acessórios para sacos de golfe: Carrinhos para transporte de sacos de golfe; Capas e estojos para sacos de golfe; Alças para bolsa de golfe; Escovas para tacos de golfe; Bolsas térmicas de golfe; Suportes de celular e GPS para golfe; Porta-cartões de pontuação de golfe; Guarda-chuvas de golfe; Bolsas para objetos de valor e acessórios de golfe
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf > Golf Çantası Aksesuarları: Golf Çantası Arabaları; Golf Çantası Örtü ve Kılıfları; Golf çantası kayışları; Golf sopası fırçaları; Golf soğutucu çantaları; Golf telefon ve GPS tutucuları; Golf skor kartı tutucuları; Golf şemsiyeleri; Golf değerli eşya ve aksesuar keseleri
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe > Acessórios para sacos de golfe: Carrinhos para sacos de golfe; Estojos e proteções de saco de golfe; Alças para sacos de golfe; Escovas para tacos de golfe; Sacos térmicos de golfe; Suportes de telemóvel e GPS de golfe; Porta-cartões de pontuação de golfe; Guarda-chuvas de golfe; Bolsas de objetos de valor e acessórios de golfe
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf > Golftasaccessoires: Golftaskarren; Golftashoezen en -houders; Draagriemen voor golftassen; Golfclubborstels; Koeltassen voor golf; Telefoon- en gps-houders voor golf; Scorekaarthouders voor golf; Golfparaplu's; Etuis voor waardevolle spullen en golfaccessoires
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ > อุปกรณ์ถุงกอล์ฟ: รถลากถุงกอล์ฟ; ถุงและกล่องใส่กระเป๋ากอล์ฟ; สายสะพายถุงกอล์ฟ; แปรงทำความสะอาดไม้กอล์ฟ; กระเป๋าเก็บความเย็นสำหรับกอล์ฟ; ที่จับโทรศัพท์และGPSสำหรับกอล์ฟ; ซองใส่สกอร์การ์ดกอล์ฟ; ร่มกอล์ฟ; กระเป๋าใส่ของมีค่าและอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับกอล์ฟ
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf > Pribor za torbu za golf: Kolica za torbu za golf; Navlake i spremnici za torbe za golf; Remeni za torbe za golf; Četke za golf palicu; Rashladne torbe za golf; Držači za telefone i GPS za golf; Držači kartica s rezultatima za golf; Kišobrani za golf; Torbice za vrijedne stvari i dodatke za golf
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф > Аксесоари за чанти за голф: Колички за чанти за голф; Калъфи и покривала за чанти за голф; Каишки за чанти за голф; Четки за голф стикове; Охладителни чанти за голф; Поставки за телефони и GPS устройства за голф; Калъфи за голф карти с резултати; Голф чадъри; Чанти за ценности и аксосоари за голф
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ > Αξεσουάρ τσάντας γκολφ: Καρότσια τσάντας γκολφ; Καλύμματα & θήκες τσάντας γκολφ; Ιμάντες για τσάντες γκολφ; Βούρτσες μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Τσάντες ψυγεία γκολφ; Βάσεις τηλεφώνου & GPS για γκολφ; Θήκες καρτών βαθμολογίας γκολφ; Ομπρέλες γκολφ; Τσαντάκια πολύτιμων αντικειμένων & αξεσουάρ γκολφ
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品 > 高尔夫球包配件: 高尔夫球包推车; 高尔夫球包外套/盒; 高尔夫球包背带; 高尔夫球杆刷; 高尔夫保温包; 高尔夫手机和 GPS 支架; 高尔夫计分卡夹; 高尔夫雨伞; 高尔夫贵重物品和配件袋
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球 > 高爾夫球袋配件: 高爾夫球袋車; 高爾夫球袋套/盒; 高爾夫球袋背帶; 高爾夫球桿刷; 高爾夫保冷袋; 高爾夫手機與 GPS 固定座; 高爾夫計分卡夾; 高爾夫雨傘; 高爾夫貴重物品與配件包